California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(III) There is a purchase option for the dwelling or unit in favor of a community land trust intended to
 preserve the dwelling or unit as affordable to qualified owners.

(IV) The dwelling or unit is to remain affordable to qualified owners by a renewable 99-year ground lease.

(ii) “Community land trust” means a nonprofit corporation exempt from federal income tax pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that satisfies all of the following:

(I) Has as its primary purposes the creation and maintenance of permanently affordable single-family or multifamily residences.

(II) (ia) All dwellings and units located on the land owned by the nonprofit corporation or its wholly owned subsidiary are
 either sold to a qualified owner to be occupied as the qualified owner’s primary residence or rented to persons and families of low or moderate income.

(ib) In the case of dwellings or units sold to qualified owners, if the community land trust, directly or through its wholly owned subsidiary, owns the land underneath the dwellings or units,
 then the land underneath the dwellings or units shall be leased to the qualified owner of a dwelling or unit on the land for the convenient occupation and use of that dwelling or unit for a renewable term of 99 years. In the case of dwellings or units that are part of a condominium, cooperative, or other common interest development under which the land is owned by a homeowners’ association or person other than the community land trust, then the condominium unit or interest owned by the community land trust shall be sold to qualified owners for the convenient occupation and use of that dwelling or unit subject to affordability restrictions as that term is defined in this subdivision, except that in lieu of a ground lease there shall be an affordability covenant, of a duration of at least 99 years, recorded against the unit or interest.

(iii) “Limited equity housing cooperative” has the same meaning as that term is
 defined in Section 817 of the Civil Code.

(iv) “Persons and families of low or moderate income” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.

(v) “Qualified owner” means persons and families of low or moderate income, including persons and families of low or moderate income that own a dwelling or unit collectively as member occupants or resident shareholders of a limited equity housing cooperative.

(b) There is a rebuttable presumption that restrictions will not be removed or substantially modified in the predictable future and that they will substantially equate the value of the land to the value attributable to the legally permissible use or uses.

(c) Grounds for rebutting the presumption may include, but
 are not necessarily limited to, the past history of like use restrictions in the jurisdiction in question and the similarity of sales prices for restricted and unrestricted land. The possible expiration of a restriction at a time certain shall not be conclusive evidence of the future removal or modification of the restriction unless there is no opportunity or likelihood of the continuation or renewal of the restriction, or unless a necessary party to the restriction has indicated an intent to permit its expiration at that time.

(d) In assessing land with respect to which the presumption is unrebutted, the assessor shall not consider sales of otherwise comparable land not similarly restricted as to use as indicative of value of land under restriction, unless the restrictions have a demonstrably minimal effect upon value.

(e) In assessing land under an enforceable use restriction
 wherein the presumption of no predictable removal or substantial modification of the restriction has been rebutted, but where the restriction nevertheless retains some future life and has some effect on present value, the assessor may consider, in addition to all other legally permissible information, representative sales of comparable lands that are not under restriction but upon which natural limitations have substantially the same effect as restrictions.

(f) For the purposes of this section the following definitions apply:

(1) “Comparable lands” are lands that are similar to the land being valued in respect to legally permissible uses and physical attributes.

(2) “Representative sales information” is information from sales of a sufficient number of comparable lands to give an accurate indication of the full cash
 value of the land being valued.

(g) It is hereby declared that the purpose and intent of the Legislature in enacting this section is to provide for a method of determining whether a sufficient amount of representative sales information is available for land under use restriction to ensure the accurate assessment of that land. It is also hereby declared that the further purpose and intent of the Legislature in enacting this section and Section 1630 is to avoid an assessment policy which, in the absence of special circumstances, considers uses for land that legally are not available to the owner and not contemplated by government, and that these sections are necessary to implement the public policy of encouraging and maintaining effective land use planning. This statute shall not be construed as requiring the assessment of any land at a value less than as required by Section 401 or as prohibiting the use of representative comparable sales
 information on land under similar restrictions when this information is available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 580, Sec. 7.5.   (AB 2897)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

402.2.

Contracts with government agencies restricting the use of property for owner-occupied housing available at affordable cost shall be recorded. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the assessor from considering a contract that restricts the use of the property to owner-occupied housing available at affordable housing cost, including under any locally adopted inclusionary housing program, for purposes of applying Section 402.1 or subdivision (a) of Section 110.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 300, Sec. 1.   (AB 2450)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

402.3.

An assessor shall consider any restrictive covenant, easement, restriction, or servitude adopted pursuant to Section 25202.5, 25222.1, or 79055 of the Health and Safety Code or any restriction, easement, covenant, or servitude imposed pursuant to Section 25230 of the Health and Safety Code as an enforceable restriction, easement, covenant, or servitude subject to Section 402.1 and shall appropriately reassess any land, the use of which has been so restricted, at the lien date following the adoption or imposition of the covenant, easement, servitude, or restriction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 122.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

402.5.

When valuing property by comparison with sales of other properties, in order to be considered comparable, the sales shall be sufficiently near in time to the valuation date, and the properties sold shall be located sufficiently near the property being valued, and shall be sufficiently alike in respect to character, size, situation, usability, zoning, or other legal restriction as to use unless rebutted pursuant to Section 402.1, to make it clear that the properties sold and the properties being valued are comparable in value and that the cash equivalent price realized for the properties sold may fairly be considered as shedding light on the value of the property being valued. “Near in time to the
 valuation date” does not include any sale more than 90 days after the valuation date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 325, Sec. 1.   (AB 1143)   Effective September 15, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

402.9.

In valuing property for persons of low and moderate income that is financed under Section 236 or Section 515 of the federal National Housing Act, since federal restrictions accompanying these programs substantially affect actual income and expenses of the property owner, the assessor shall not consider as income any interest subsidy payments made to a lender on that property by the federal government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 941, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

402.95.

In valuing property under the income method of appraisal, the assessor shall exclude from income the benefit from federal and state low-income housing tax credits allocated by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee pursuant to Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code and Sections 12206, 17058, and 23610.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 786, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

403.

Land sold by the State for which no patent has been issued shall be assessed like other land, but the owner is entitled to a deduction from the assessed valuation of the amount due the State as principal on the purchase price.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

404.

All taxable property, except State assessed property, shall be assessed by the assessing agency of the taxing agency where the property is situated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

405.

(a) Annually, the assessor shall assess all the taxable property in his county, except state-assessed property, to the persons owning, claiming, possessing, or controlling it on the lien date.

The assessor may assess the property on the secured roll to the person owning, claiming, possessing or controlling it for the ensuing fiscal year.

(b) The assessor may assess all taxable property in his county on the unsecured roll jointly to both the lessee and lessor of such property.

(c) Notices of assessment and tax bills relating to jointly assessed property on the unsecured roll shall be mailed to both the lessee and the lessor at their latest addresses known to the assessor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 261, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

405.5.

The assessor shall periodically appraise all property not subject to the provisions of Article XIIIA of the Constitution to substantiate the judgment of its full cash value or, when provided for by law, its restricted value for uniform assessment purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1081, Sec. 5.   Effective September 26, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

407.

Annually, on the second Monday in July, the assessor shall transmit a statistical statement to the board, supplying any statistical information which the board may require, and shall supply from time to time any other information required by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 608, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

408.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e), and (g), any information and records in the assessor’s office that are not required by law to be kept or prepared by the assessor, disabled veterans’ exemption claims, and homeowners’ exemption claims are not public documents and shall not be open to public inspection. Property receiving the homeowners’ exemption shall be clearly identified on the assessment roll. The assessor shall maintain records that shall be open to public inspection to identify those claimants who have been granted the homeowners’ exemption.

(b) (1) The assessor may provide any appraisal data in
 the assessor’s possession to the assessor of any county.

(2) The assessor shall disclose information, furnish abstracts, or permit access to all records in the assessor’s office to law enforcement agencies, the county grand jury, the board of supervisors or their duly authorized agents, employees, or representatives when conducting an investigation of the assessor’s office pursuant to Section 25303 of the Government Code, the county recorder when conducting an investigation to determine whether a documentary transfer tax is imposed, the Controller, employees of the Controller for property tax postponement purposes, probate referees, employees of the Franchise Tax Board for tax administration purposes only, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, staff appraisers of the Division of Financial Institutions, the
 Department of Transportation, the Department of General Services, the High-Speed Rail Authority, the State Board of Equalization, the State Lands Commission, the State Department of Social Services, the Department of Child Support Services, the Department of Water Resources, and other duly authorized legislative or administrative bodies of the state pursuant to their authorization to examine the records. Whenever the assessor discloses information, furnishes abstracts, or permits access to records in the assessor’s office to staff appraisers of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, the Department of Transportation, the Department of General Services, the High-Speed Rail Authority, the State Lands Commission, or the Department of Water Resources pursuant to this section, the department, commission, or authority shall reimburse the assessor for any costs incurred as a
 result.

(c) Upon the request of the tax collector, the assessor shall disclose and provide to the tax collector information used in the preparation of that portion of the unsecured roll for which the taxes thereon are delinquent. The tax collector shall certify to the assessor that the tax collector needs the information requested for the enforcement of the tax lien in collecting those delinquent taxes. Information requested by the tax collector may include social security numbers, and the assessor shall recover from the tax collector the assessor’s actual and reasonable costs for providing the information. The tax collector shall add the costs described in the preceding sentence to the assessee’s delinquent tax lien and collect those costs subject to subdivision (e) of Section 2922.

(d) The assessor shall, upon the request of an assessee or the assessee’s designated representative, permit the assessee or representative to inspect or copy any market data in the assessor’s possession. For purposes of this subdivision, “market data” means any information in the assessor’s possession, whether or not required to be prepared or kept by the assessor, relating to the sale of any property comparable to the property of the assessee, if the assessor bases an assessment of the assessee’s property, in whole or in part, on that comparable sale or sales. The assessor shall provide the names of the seller and buyer of each property on which the comparison is based, the location of that property, the date of the sale, and the consideration paid for the property, whether paid in money or otherwise. However, for purposes of providing market data, the assessor shall not display any
 document relating to the business affairs or property of another.

(e) (1) With respect to information, documents, and records, other than market data as defined in subdivision (d), the assessor shall, upon request of an assessee of property or the assessee’s designated representative, permit the assessee or representative to inspect or copy all information, documents, and records, including auditors’ narrations and workpapers, whether or not required to be kept or prepared by the assessor, relating to the appraisal and the assessment of the assessee’s property, and any penalties and interest.

(A) Upon written request of an assessee or the assessee’s designated representative, the assessor shall transmit the information, documents, or records described in
 paragraph (1) by mail, or in electronic format if the information, documents, or records are available in electronic format or have been previously digitized. This subparagraph shall not be construed or interpreted to limit the authority of the assessee or the assessee’s designated representative to also inspect or copy information, documents, or records described in paragraph (1).

(B) Information, documents, and records requested by an assessee, or the assessee’s representative, shall be transmitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) within a reasonable time period.

(C) The costs enumerated in subdivision (a) of Section 409 shall not apply to information, documents, or records requested by the assessee or the assessee’s designated representative if that information is transmitted in
 electronic format, except that any developmental or indirect costs to provide that information, including costs to acquire or compile data that is not required to be kept or prepared by the assessor, may be recovered pursuant to Section 409.

(2) After enrolling an assessment, the assessor shall respond to a written request for information supporting the assessment, including, but not limited to, any appraisal and other data requested by the assessee.

(3) Except as provided in Section 408.1, an assessee or
 the assessee’s designated representative shall not be permitted to inspect or copy information and records that also relate to the property or business affairs of another, unless that disclosure is ordered by a competent court in a proceeding initiated by a taxpayer seeking to challenge the legality of the assessment of the taxpayer’s property.

(f) (1) Permission for the inspection or copying requested pursuant to subdivision (d) or (e) shall be granted as soon as reasonably possible to the assessee or the assessee’s
 designated representative.

(2) If the assessee or the assessee’s designated representative requests the assessor to make copies of any of the requested records, the assessee shall reimburse the assessor for the reasonable costs incurred in reproducing and providing the copies.

(3) If the assessor fails to permit the inspection or copying of materials or information as requested pursuant to subdivision (d) or (e) and the assessor introduces any requested materials or information at any assessment appeals board hearing, the assessee or the assessee’s representative may request and shall be granted a continuance for a reasonable period of time. The continuance shall extend the two-year period specified in subdivision (c) of Section 1604 for a period of time equal to the period
 of continuance.

(g) Upon the written request of the tax collector, the assessor shall provide to the tax collector information for the preparation and enforcement of Part 6 (commencing with Section 3351). The tax collector shall certify to the assessor that the tax collector needs the contact information to assist with the preparation and enforcement of Part 6 (commencing with Section 3351). The assessor shall provide the information, which shall not include social security numbers. Any information provided to the tax collector pursuant to this subdivision shall not become a public record and shall not be open to public inspection. The tax collector
 shall reimburse the assessor for the actual and reasonable costs incurred by the assessor for providing the information to administer this subdivision. The tax collector shall add the costs described in the preceding sentence to the assessee’s delinquent taxes and include the costs incurred subject to Sections 4112 and 4672.2. The tax collector or the tax collector’s designated employee shall, under penalty of perjury, certify to the assessor that they need the information to assist with the preparation and enforcement of Part 6 (commencing with Section 3351), and that the information provided pursuant to this subdivision that is not a public record and that is not open to public inspection shall not become a public record and shall not be open to public inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 9.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

408.1.

(a) The assessor shall maintain a list of transfers of any interest in property, other than undivided interests, within the county, which have occurred within the preceding two-year period.

(b) The list shall be divided into geographical areas and shall be revised on the 30th day of each calendar quarter to include all such transactions which are recorded as of the preceding quarter.

(c) The list shall contain the following information:

(1) Transferor and transferee, if available;

(2) Assessor’s parcel number;

(3) Address of the sales property;

(4) Date of transfer;

(5) Date of recording and recording reference number;

(6) Where it is known by the assessor, the consideration paid for such property; and

(7) Additional information which the assessor in his discretion may wish to add to carry out the purpose and intent of this section. Other than sales information, the assessor shall not include information on the list which relates to the business or business affairs of the owner of the property, information concerning the business carried on upon the subject property, or the income or income stream generated by the property.

(d) The list shall be open to inspection by any person. The assessor may require the payment of a nonrefundable fee equal to an amount which would reimburse local agencies for their actual administrative costs incurred in such inspections or ten dollars ($10), whichever is the lesser amount.

(e) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any county with a population of under 50,000 people, as determined by the 1970 federal decennial census. 

(f) Pursuant to Section 481, the assessor shall not include information on the list which was furnished in the change in ownership statement by the transferee and is not otherwise public information.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1349, Sec. 2.6.)
-------------------------------------------

408.2.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 63.1, 69.5, 451, and 481 of this code and in the provisions listed in Section 7920.505 of the Government Code, any information and records in the assessor’s office that are required by law to be kept or prepared by the assessor, other than homeowners’ exemption claims, are public records and shall be open to public inspection. Property receiving the homeowners’ exemption shall be clearly identified on the assessment roll. The assessor shall maintain records that shall be open to public inspection to identify those claimants who have been granted the homeowners’ exemption.

(b) The assessor may provide any
 appraisal data in the assessor’s possession to the assessor of any county and shall provide any market data in the assessor’s possession to an assessee of property or an assessee’s designated representative upon request. The assessor shall permit an assessee of property or an assessee’s designated representative to inspect at the assessor’s office any information and records, whether or not required to be kept or prepared by the assessor, relating to the appraisal and the assessment of the assessee’s property. Except as provided in Section 408.1, an assessee or an assessee’s designated representative, however, shall not be provided or permitted to inspect information and records, other than market data, which also relate to the property or business affairs of another person, unless that disclosure is ordered by a competent court in a proceeding initiated by a taxpayer seeking to challenge the
 legality of the taxpayer’s assessment.

(c) The assessor shall disclose information, furnish abstracts, or permit access to all records in the assessor’s office to law enforcement agencies, the county grand jury, the board of supervisors or their duly authorized agents, employees, or representatives when conducting an investigation of the assessor’s office pursuant to Section 25303 of the Government Code, the Controller, probate referees, employees of the Franchise Tax Board for tax administration purposes only, the State Board of Equalization, and other duly authorized legislative or administrative bodies of the state pursuant to their authorization to examine the records.

(d) For purposes of this section, “market data” means any information in the assessor’s
 possession, whether or not required to be prepared or kept by the assessor, relating to the sale of any property comparable to the property of the assessee, if the assessor bases the assessment of the assessee’s property, in whole or in part, on that comparable sale or sales. The assessor shall provide the names of the seller and buyer of each property on which the comparison is based, the location of that property, the date of the sale, and the consideration paid for the property, whether paid in money or otherwise, but for purposes of providing market data, the assessor shall not display any document relating to the business affairs or property of another.

(e) This section applies only to a county with a population that exceeds 4,000,000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 410.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

408.3.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 451 and 481 and in the provisions listed in Section 7920.505 of the Government Code, property characteristics information maintained by the assessor is a public record and shall be open to public inspection.

(b) For purposes of this section, “property characteristics,” includes, but is not limited to, the year of construction of improvements to the property, their square footage, the number of bedrooms and bathrooms of all dwellings, the property’s acreage, and other attributes of or amenities to the property, such as swimming pools, views, zoning classifications or restrictions, use code
 designations, and the number of dwelling units of multiple family properties.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 7922.530 of the Government Code or any other provision of law, if the assessor provides property characteristics information at the request of any party, the assessor may require that a fee reasonably related to the actual cost of developing and providing the information be paid by the party receiving the information.

(2) The actual cost of providing the information is not limited to duplication or production costs, but may include recovery of developmental and indirect costs, as overhead, personnel, supply, material, office, storage, and computer costs. All revenue collected by the assessor for providing information under this section
 shall be used solely to support, maintain, improve, and provide for the creation, retention, automation, and retrieval of assessor information.

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that information concerning property characteristics is maintained solely for assessment purposes and is not continuously updated by the assessor. Therefore, neither the county nor the assessor shall incur any liability for errors, omissions, or approximations with respect to property characteristics information provided by the assessor to any party pursuant to this section. Further, this subdivision shall not be construed to imply liability on the part of the county or the assessor for errors, omissions, or other defects in any other information or records provided by the assessor pursuant to the provisions of this
 part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 411.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

408.4.

(a) The assessor shall disclose information, furnish abstracts, or permit access to all records in his or her office to designated employees of a city’s finance office when conducting an investigation to determine whether a documentary transfer tax should be imposed for an unrecorded change in control or ownership of property.

(b) Upon the written request of a designated employee of a city’s finance office, the assessor shall provide to the designated employee of a city’s finance office information for the preparation and enforcement of Part 6.7 (commencing with Section 11901) of Division 2. The information provided by the assessor shall not include social security numbers. The designated employee of a city’s finance office shall, under penalty of perjury, certify to the assessor that he or she needs the information to
 assist with the preparation and enforcement of Part 6.7 (commencing with Section 11901) of Division 2 and that the information provided pursuant to this subdivision that is not public record and that is not open to public inspection shall not become public record and shall not be open to public inspection.

(c) Whenever the assessor discloses information, furnishes abstracts, or permits access to records in his or her office to designated employees of a city’s finance office pursuant to this subdivision, the city shall reimburse the assessor for any costs incurred as a result thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 320, Sec. 1.   (AB 563)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

409.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 7922.530 of the Government Code or any other statutory provision, if the assessor, pursuant to the request of any party, provides information or records that the assessor is not required by law to prepare or keep, the county may require that a fee reasonably related to the actual cost of developing and providing that information be paid by the party receiving the information.

(2) The actual cost of providing the information is not limited to duplication or reproduction costs, but may include recovery of developmental and indirect costs, such as overhead, personnel, supply,
 material, office, storage, and computer costs.

(3) It is the intent of this section that the county may impose this fee for information and records maintained for county use, as well as for information and records not maintained for county use.

(4) Nothing herein shall be construed to require an assessor to provide information to any party beyond that the assessor is otherwise statutorily required to provide.

(b) For purposes of this section, “market data,” as defined in Section 408.1, shall be deemed to be information the assessor is required by law to prepare or keep when requested by the assessee or a designated representative of the assessee.

(c) This section
 shall not apply to requests of the State Board of Equalization for information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 412.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.3. Assessment of Implements of Husbandry [410. - 414.]

410.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to provide for a uniform system of assessment of all implements of husbandry in this state, regardless of where located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

411.

For the purposes of this article, “implement of husbandry” includes, but is not limited to, any tool, machine, equipment, appliance, device or apparatus used in the conduct of agricultural operations, except where such implements are intended for sale in the ordinary course of business.

“Implement of husbandry” also includes those implements of husbandry as defined in the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

412.

The assessor of the county in which the implement of husbandry is located shall assess the implement as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

413.

In assessing the implement of husbandry, the county assessor shall determine the value of the implement in accordance with standards and guides to the full cash value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------

414.

Upon request of the assessor of the county in which an implement of husbandry is located, the owner shall file with him a statement setting forth the make, model and year of manufacture of the implement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 973.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Valuation of Open-Space Land Subject to an Enforceable Restriction [421. - 430.5.]

421.

For the purposes of this article:

(a) “Agricultural preserve” means an agricultural preserve created pursuant to the California Land Conservation Act of 1965 (Williamson Act) (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 51200) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(b) “Contract” means a contract executed pursuant to the California Land Conservation Act.

(c) “Agreement” means an agreement executed pursuant to the California Land Conservation Act prior to the 61st day following the final adjournment of the 1969 Regular Session of the Legislature and that, taken as a whole, provides restrictions, terms and conditions that are substantially similar or more restrictive than those required by statute for a contract.

(d) “Scenic restriction” means any interest or right in real property acquired by a city or county pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 6950) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, where the deed or other instrument granting such right or interest imposes restrictions that, through limitation of their future use, will effectively preserve for public use and enjoyment, the character of open spaces and areas as defined in Section 6954 of the Government Code.

A scenic restriction shall be for an initial term of 10 years or more, and shall provide for either of the following:

(1) A method whereby the term may be extended by mutual agreement of the parties.

(2) That the initial term shall be subject to annual automatic one-year extensions as provided for contracts in Sections 51244, 51244.5, and 51246 of the Government Code, unless notice of nonrenewal is given as provided in Section 51245 of the Government Code.

A scenic restriction may not be terminated prior to the expiration of the initial term, and any extension thereof, except as provided for cancellation of contracts in Sections 51281, 51282, 51283 and 51283.3 of the Government Code, and subject to the provisions therein for payment of the cancellation fee.

(e) “Open-space easement” means an open-space easement granted to a county or city pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 51050) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code if the easement is acquired prior to January 1, 1975, or an open-space easement granted to a county, city, or nonprofit organization pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 51070) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code if the easement is acquired after January 1, 1975, or an open-space easement granted to a regional park district, regional park and open-space district, or regional open-space district under Article 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Chapter 3 of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code.

(f) “Wildlife habitat contract” means any contract or amended contract or covenant involving, except as provided in Section 423.8, 150 acres or more of land entered into by a landowner with any agency or political subdivision of the federal or state government limiting the use of lands for a period of 10 or more years by the landowner to habitat for native or migratory wildlife and native pasture. These lands shall, by contract, be eligible to receive water for waterfowl or waterfowl management purposes from the federal government.

(g) “Open-space land” means any of the following:

(1) Land within an agricultural preserve and subject to a contract or an agreement.

(2) Land subject to a scenic restriction.

(3) Land subject to an open-space easement.

(4) Land that has been restricted by a political subdivision or an entity of the state or federal government, acting within the scope of its regulatory or other legal authority, for the benefit of wildlife, endangered species, or their habitats.

(h) “Typical rotation period” means a period of years during which different crops are grown as part of a plant cultural program. Typical rotation period does not mean the rotation period of timber.

(i) “Wildlife” means waterfowl of every kind and any other undomesticated mammal, fish, or bird, or any reptile, amphibian, insect, or plant.

(j) “Endangered species” means any species or subcategory thereof, as defined in the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code) or the federal Endangered Species Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), that has been classified and protected as an endangered, threatened, rare, or candidate species by any entity of the state or federal government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 997, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 1996.   Applicable, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 997, commencing with property taxes levied for the first lien date after September 27, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

421.5.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meaning:

(a) “Agricultural conservation easement” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 10211 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) “Open-space land” includes land subject to an agricultural conservation easement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 616, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

422.

For the purposes of this article and within the meaning of Section 8 of Article XIII of the Constitution, open-space land is “enforceably restricted” if it is subject to any of the following:

(a) A contract;

(b) An agreement;

(c) A scenic restriction entered into prior to January 1, 1975;

(d) An open-space easement; or

(e) A wildlife habitat contract.

For the purposes of this article no restriction upon the use of land other than those enumerated in this section shall be considered to be an enforceable restriction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 224.)
-------------------------------------------

422.5.

For the purposes of this article, open-space land is “enforceably restricted” within the meaning of Section 8 of Article XIII of the California Constitution if it is subject to an agricultural conservation easement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 931, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

422.7.

(a) For purposes of this section, the term “open-space land” includes land subject to contract for an urban agricultural incentive zone, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 51040.3 of the Government Code. For purposes of this section, open-space land is enforceably restricted within the meaning of Section 8 of Article XIII of the California Constitution if it is subject to an urban agriculture incentive zone contract. 

(b) (1) Open-space land subject to contract for an urban agricultural incentive zone pursuant to Section 52010.3 shall be valued for assessment at the rate based on the average per-acre value of irrigated cropland in California, adjusted proportionally to reflect
 the acreage of the property under contract, as most recently published by the National Agricultural Statistics Service of the United States Department of Agriculture.
